Delaware, session 153, HB68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 6, Title 1 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 610. 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion Day. March 9 is known as 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion Day and should be commemorated in this State by appropriate ceremonies to honor the 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion members. In commemorating this day, citizens are encouraged to write and mail letters to family, friends, military personnel, and veterans to recognize postal employees and the important service these employees provide in connecting us to each other.